Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3707
Program director; duties.

The program director of the court appointed special advocate program shall be responsible for the administration of the program, including recruitment, selection, training, supervision, and evaluation of staff and court appointed special advocate volunteers.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 30.